Utah statutes.
32B-4-601.   Unlawful removal from conveyance or diversion of shipment.

(1)  It is unlawful for a person transporting an alcoholic product, including a motor carrier, in interstate or other commerce intended for, or consigned to, or claimed to be intended for or consigned to a person outside of this state, to remove or to permit a person to remove the alcoholic product or any part of the alcoholic product from the conveyance in which it is carried while within this state.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), removal of an alcoholic product from a conveyance may be allowed if the person described in Subsection (1) notifies the department in writing at least 24 hours before the intended removal and complies with the instructions given by the department.

(3)  It is unlawful for a person to receive for storage or another purpose, or to possess an alcoholic product, that is removed from a vehicle or other conveyance in violation of this section.

(4)  It is unlawful for a person, including a motor vehicle, to divert to any place within this state, or to deliver to any person in this state, an alcoholic product that is consigned for shipment to any place without this state, unless the person:

(a)  first notifies the department in writing at least 24 hours before the intended diversion or delivery; and

(b)  complies with the instructions given by the department.

(5)  Upon receiving a notice under Subsection (2) or (4), the department shall take precautions as necessary to ensure compliance with the laws of this state relating to an alcoholic product.

